District of Columbia statutes.
13-503

Action against principal and sureties.

In an action against principal and sureties, an indebtedness of the plaintiff to the principal may be set off by counterclaim as if he were the sole defendant. When the indebtedness so set off exceeds the plaintiff’s demand, the judgment for the excess shall be in favor of the defendant who is sued as principal.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 516, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 13-503.
1973 Ed., § 13-503.

Prior Codifications